Utah statutes.
77-28a-3.   Duties and powers of courts, departments, agencies and officers
in enforcing and effecting compact.
The courts, departments, agencies and officers of this state and its political
subdivisions shall enforce this Compact and shall do all things necessary and
appropriate to the effectuation of the purposes and intent of this Compact
which may be within their respective jurisdictions including, but not limited
to, the making and submission of any reports required by that Compact.
